Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.123, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Professional development. (a) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers and staff by July 1, 2026: (1) reading intervention teachers working with students in kindergarten through grade 12; (2) all classroom teachers of students in kindergarten through grade 3 and children in prekindergarten programs; (3) special education teachers; (4) curriculum directors; (5) instructional support staff, contractors, and volunteers who assist in providing Tier 2 interventions; (6) employees who select literacy instructional materials for a district; and (7) teachers licensed to teach English to multilingual learners. (b) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers by July 1, 2027: (1) teachers who provide reading instruction to students in grades 4 to 12; and (2) teachers who provide instruction to students in a state-approved alternative program. (c) The commissioner of education may grant a district an extension to the deadlines in this subdivision. (d) Training provided by a department-approved certified trained facilitator may satisfy the professional development requirements under this subdivision. (e) For the 2024-2025new text begin and 2025-2026new text end school deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin yearsnew text end only, the hours of instruction requirement under section 120A.41 for students in an elementary school, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivision 9, is reduced by 5-1/2 hours for a district that enters into an agreement with the exclusive representative of the teachers that requires teachers to receive at least 5-1/2 hours of approved evidence-based training required under this subdivision, on a day when other students in the district receive instruction. If a charter school's teachers are not represented by an exclusive representative, the charter school may reduce the number of instructional hours for students in an elementary school, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivision 9, by 5-1/2 hours after consulting with its teachers in order to provide teachers with at least 5-1/2 hours of evidence-based training required under this subdivision on a day when other students receive instruction.